Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-340
State park system; classification of areas.

The commission shall periodically evaluate and assess the state park system by classifications and may redesignate specific areas from one class to another.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 4, p. 1466;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.24;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 98.